Utah statutes.
76-6-405.   Theft by deception.
(1) A person commits theft if he obtains or exercises control over property of
another by deception and with a purpose to deprive him thereof.
(2)  Theft by deception does not occur, however, when there is only falsity as
to matters having no pecuniary significance, or puffing by statements unlikely
to deceive ordinary persons in the group addressed. "Puffing" means an
exaggerated commendation of wares or worth in communications addressed to the
public or to a class or group.
